Washington statutes.
RCW 18.28.900

Saving prior contracts.

The provisions of this chapter shall not invalidate or make unlawful contracts between debt adjusters and debtors executed prior to the effective date of this chapter.

[ 1967 c 201 s 23.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1967 c 201: June 8, 1967, see preface to 1967 session laws.